lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3023 Y 123
SFX 3023 us us . 38
SFX 3023 us aus . 39
SFX 3023 us iam [^djt]us 42
SFX 3023 us ų . 43
SFX 3023 us iu [^djt]us 44
SFX 3023 us iame [^djt]us 45
SFX 3023 us iam [^djt]us 87
SFX 3023 us us . 52
SFX 3023 us ūs . 40
SFX 3023 us ių [^djt]us 41
SFX 3023 us iems . 46
SFX 3023 us iem . 47
SFX 3023 us ius [^djt]us 48
SFX 3023 us iais [^djt]us 49
SFX 3023 us iuose [^djt]us 50
SFX 3023 us iuos [^djt]us 51
SFX 3023 us ūs . 57
SFX 3023 us i . 94
SFX 3023 us ios [^djt]us 95
SFX 3023 us iai [^djt]us 98
SFX 3023 us ią [^djt]us 99
SFX 3023 us ia [^djt]us 100
SFX 3023 us ioje [^djt]us 101
SFX 3023 us ioj [^djt]us 102
SFX 3023 us i . 109
SFX 3023 us ios [^djt]us 96
SFX 3023 us ių [^djt]us 97
SFX 3023 us ioms [^djt]us 103
SFX 3023 us iom [^djt]us 104
SFX 3023 us ias [^djt]us 105
SFX 3023 us iomis [^djt]us 106
SFX 3023 us iom [^djt]us 107
SFX 3023 us iose [^djt]us 108
SFX 3023 us ios [^djt]us 110
SFX 3023 us žiam dus 42
SFX 3023 us žiu dus 44
SFX 3023 us žiame dus 45
SFX 3023 us žiam dus 87
SFX 3023 us žių dus 41
SFX 3023 us žius dus 48
SFX 3023 us žiais dus 49
SFX 3023 us žiuose dus 50
SFX 3023 us žiuos dus 51
SFX 3023 us žios dus 95
SFX 3023 us žiai dus 98
SFX 3023 us žią dus 99
SFX 3023 us žia dus 100
SFX 3023 us žioje dus 101
SFX 3023 us žioj dus 102
SFX 3023 us žios dus 96
SFX 3023 us žių dus 97
SFX 3023 us žioms dus 103
SFX 3023 us žiom dus 104
SFX 3023 us žias dus 105
SFX 3023 us žiomis dus 106
SFX 3023 us žiom dus 107
SFX 3023 us žiose dus 108
SFX 3023 us žios dus 110
SFX 3023 us am jus 42
SFX 3023 us u jus 44
SFX 3023 us ame jus 45
SFX 3023 us am jus 87
SFX 3023 us ų jus 41
SFX 3023 us us jus 48
SFX 3023 us ais jus 49
SFX 3023 us uose jus 50
SFX 3023 us uos jus 51
SFX 3023 us os jus 95
SFX 3023 us ai jus 98
SFX 3023 us ą jus 99
SFX 3023 us a jus 100
SFX 3023 us oje jus 101
SFX 3023 us oj jus 102
SFX 3023 us os jus 96
SFX 3023 us ų jus 97
SFX 3023 us oms jus 103
SFX 3023 us om jus 104
SFX 3023 us as jus 105
SFX 3023 us omis jus 106
SFX 3023 us om jus 107
SFX 3023 us ose jus 108
SFX 3023 us os jus 110
SFX 3023 tus čiam tus 42
SFX 3023 tus čiu tus 44
SFX 3023 tus čiame tus 45
SFX 3023 tus čiam tus 87
SFX 3023 tus čių tus 41
SFX 3023 tus čius tus 48
SFX 3023 tus čiais tus 49
SFX 3023 tus čiuose tus 50
SFX 3023 tus čiuos tus 51
SFX 3023 tus čios tus 95
SFX 3023 tus čiai tus 98
SFX 3023 tus čią tus 99
SFX 3023 tus čia tus 100
SFX 3023 tus čioje tus 101
SFX 3023 tus čioj tus 102
SFX 3023 tus čios tus 96
SFX 3023 tus čių tus 97
SFX 3023 tus čioms tus 103
SFX 3023 tus čiom tus 104
SFX 3023 tus čias tus 105
SFX 3023 tus čiomis tus 106
SFX 3023 tus čiom tus 107
SFX 3023 tus čiose tus 108
SFX 3023 tus čios tus 110
SFX 3023 i i . 94
SFX 3023 i ios [^djt]i 95
SFX 3023 i iai [^djt]i 98
SFX 3023 i ią [^djt]i 99
SFX 3023 i ia [^djt]i 100
SFX 3023 i ioje [^djt]i 101
SFX 3023 i ioj [^djt]i 102
SFX 3023 i i . 109
SFX 3023 i ios [^djt]i 96
SFX 3023 i ių [^djt]i 97
SFX 3023 i ioms [^djt]i 103
SFX 3023 i iom [^djt]i 104
SFX 3023 i ias [^djt]i 105
SFX 3023 i iomis [^djt]i 106
SFX 3023 i iom [^djt]i 107
SFX 3023 i iose [^djt]i 108
SFX 3023 i ios [^djt]i 110

SFX 3031 Y 18
SFX 3031 us ian [^djt]us 54
SFX 3031 us iuosna [^djt]us 55
SFX 3031 us ion [^djt]us 112
SFX 3031 us iosna [^djt]us 113
SFX 3031 us žian dus 54
SFX 3031 us žiuosna dus 55
SFX 3031 us žion dus 112
SFX 3031 us žiosna dus 113
SFX 3031 us an jus 54
SFX 3031 us uosna jus 55
SFX 3031 us on jus 112
SFX 3031 us osna jus 113
SFX 3031 tus čian tus 54
SFX 3031 tus čiuosna tus 55
SFX 3031 tus čion tus 112
SFX 3031 tus čiosna tus 113
SFX 3031 i ion [^djt]i 112
SFX 3031 i iosna [^djt]i 113

SFX 3032 Y 6
SFX 3032 us iu [^djt]us 56
SFX 3032 us i . 114
SFX 3032 us žiu dus 56
SFX 3032 us u jus 56
SFX 3032 tus čiu tus 56
SFX 3032 i i . 114

SFX 3150 Y 9
SFX 3150 us u . 147
SFX 3150 us iau [^djt]us 148
SFX 3150 us žiau dus 148
SFX 3150 us au jus 148
SFX 3150 tus čiau tus 148
SFX 3150 us iausia [^dt]us 149
SFX 3150 us žiausia dus 149
SFX 3150 us ausia jus 149
SFX 3150 tus čiausia tus 149

SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 us ėliau . 150

SFX 3160 Y 1
SFX 3160 us usis/531 . 151

SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 us usis/532 . 151

SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 us usis/533 . 151

SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 us esnis/534 . 152

SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 us esnis/535 . 152

SFX 3165 Y 1
SFX 3165 us esnis/536 . 152

SFX 3166 Y 5
SFX 3166 us esnysis/531 . 153
SFX 3166 us iausiasis/531 [^djt]us 154
SFX 3166 us žiausiasis/531 dus 154
SFX 3166 us ausiasis/531 jus 154
SFX 3166 tus čiausiasis/531 tus 154

SFX 3167 Y 5
SFX 3167 us esnysis/532 . 153
SFX 3167 us iausiasis/532 [^djt]us 154
SFX 3167 us žiausiasis/532 dus 154
SFX 3167 us ausiasis/532 jus 154
SFX 3167 tus čiausiasis/532 tus 154

SFX 3168 Y 5
SFX 3168 us esnysis/533 . 153
SFX 3168 us iausiasis/533 [^djt]us 154
SFX 3168 us žiausiasis/533 dus 154
SFX 3168 us ausiasis/533 jus 154
SFX 3168 tus čiausiasis/533 tus 154

SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 us ėlesnis/534 . 155

SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 us ėlesnis/535 . 155

SFX 3171 Y 1
SFX 3171 us ėlesnis/536 . 155

SFX 3172 Y 1
SFX 3172 us ėlesnysis/531 . 156

SFX 3173 Y 1
SFX 3173 us ėlesnysis/532 . 156

SFX 3174 Y 1
SFX 3174 us ėlesnysis/533 . 156

SFX 3175 Y 4
SFX 3175 us iausias/537 [^djt]us 157
SFX 3175 us žiausias/537 dus 157
SFX 3175 us ausias/537 jus 157
SFX 3175 tus čiausias/537 tus 157

SFX 3176 Y 4
SFX 3176 us iausias/538 [^djt]us 157
SFX 3176 us žiausias/538 dus 157
SFX 3176 us ausias/538 jus 157
SFX 3176 tus čiausias/538 tus 157

SFX 3177 Y 4
SFX 3177 us iausias/539 [^djt]us 157
SFX 3177 us žiausias/539 dus 157
SFX 3177 us ausias/539 jus 157
SFX 3177 tus čiausias/539 tus 157

SFX 3219 Y 46
SFX 3219 ntis ntis . 38
SFX 3219 antis ąs . 159
SFX 3219 intis įs . 159
SFX 3219 tis čio . 39
SFX 3219 tis čiam . 42
SFX 3219 is į . 43
SFX 3219 tis čiu . 44
SFX 3219 tis čiame . 45
SFX 3219 tis čiam . 87
SFX 3219 is is . 52
SFX 3219 antis ąs . 53
SFX 3219 intis įs . 53
SFX 3219 is ys . 40
SFX 3219 antis ą . 160
SFX 3219 intis į . 160
SFX 3219 tis čių . 41
SFX 3219 is iems . 46
SFX 3219 is iem . 47
SFX 3219 tis čius . 48
SFX 3219 tis čiais . 49
SFX 3219 tis čiuose . 50
SFX 3219 tis čiuos . 51
SFX 3219 is ys . 57
SFX 3219 antis ą . 161
SFX 3219 intis į . 161
SFX 3219 is i . 94
SFX 3219 tis čios . 95
SFX 3219 tis čiai . 98
SFX 3219 tis čią . 99
SFX 3219 tis čia . 100
SFX 3219 tis čioje . 101
SFX 3219 tis čioj . 102
SFX 3219 tis i . 109
SFX 3219 tis čios . 96
SFX 3219 antis ą . 162
SFX 3219 intis į . 162
SFX 3219 tis čių . 97
SFX 3219 tis čioms . 103
SFX 3219 tis čiom . 104
SFX 3219 tis čias . 105
SFX 3219 tis čiomis . 106
SFX 3219 tis čiom . 107
SFX 3219 tis čiose . 108
SFX 3219 tis čios . 110
SFX 3219 antis ą . 163
SFX 3219 intis į . 163

SFX 3231 Y 4
SFX 3231 tis čian . 54
SFX 3231 tis čiuosna . 55
SFX 3231 tis čion . 112
SFX 3231 tis čiosna . 113

SFX 3232 Y 2
SFX 3232 tis čiu . 56
SFX 3232 is i . 114

SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 is ysis/531 . 151

SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 is ysis/532 . 151

SFX 3273 Y 1
SFX 3273 is ysis/533 . 151

SFX 3274 Y 40
SFX 3274 siantis siantis . 38
SFX 3274 antis ąs . 159
SFX 3274 tis čio . 39
SFX 3274 tis čiam . 42
SFX 3274 is į . 43
SFX 3274 tis čiu . 44
SFX 3274 tis čiame . 45
SFX 3274 tis čiam . 87
SFX 3274 is is . 52
SFX 3274 antis ąs . 53
SFX 3274 antis ą . 160
SFX 3274 is ys . 40
SFX 3274 tis čių . 41
SFX 3274 is iems . 46
SFX 3274 is iem . 47
SFX 3274 tis čius . 48
SFX 3274 tis čiais . 49
SFX 3274 tis čiuose . 50
SFX 3274 tis čiuos . 51
SFX 3274 is ys . 57
SFX 3274 antis ą . 161
SFX 3274 is i . 94
SFX 3274 tis čios . 95
SFX 3274 tis čiai . 98
SFX 3274 tis čią . 99
SFX 3274 tis čia . 100
SFX 3274 tis čioje . 101
SFX 3274 tis čioj . 102
SFX 3274 tis i . 109
SFX 3274 tis čios . 96
SFX 3274 antis ą . 164
SFX 3274 tis čių . 97
SFX 3274 tis čioms . 103
SFX 3274 tis čiom . 104
SFX 3274 tis čias . 105
SFX 3274 tis čiomis . 106
SFX 3274 tis čiom . 107
SFX 3274 tis čiose . 108
SFX 3274 tis čios . 110
SFX 3274 antis ą . 165

SFX 3284 Y 4
SFX 3284 tis čian . 54
SFX 3284 tis čiuosna . 55
SFX 3284 tis čion . 112
SFX 3284 tis čiosna . 113

AF 3023,3150,3155,3160,3163,3166,3169,3172,3175,30001 # 43
AF 3023,3031,3150,3155,3160,3161,3163,3164,3166,3167,3169,3170,3172,3173,3175,3176,30001 # 82
AF 3023,3150,3160,3163,3166,3175,30001 # 118
AF 3023,3150,3160,30001 # 245
AF 3219,3271,30001 # 246
