lt_LT.dic
akivaizdus/82	8
ankstus/82	8
artus/82	8
aršus/43	8
aseksualus/43	8
atokus/82	8
atsakantis/246	8
baisus/82	8
biseksualus/43	8
bjaurus/43	8
blandus/43	8
brangus/82	8
derlus/43	8
deskriptyvus/118	8
dezinformatyvus/43	8
eiklus/43	8
ekspansyvus/43	8
eksteritorialus/43	8
fašistuojantis/246	8
garsus/82	8
gašlus/43	8
geostacionarus/43	8
gilus/82	8
hiperaktyvus/43	8
hiperseksualus/43	8
idealus/43	8
intermituojantis/246	8
intymus/43	8
ireguliarus/43	8
iškilnus/43	8
jautrus/82	8
kandus/43	8
kartus/43	8
klaidus/43	8
konservatyvus/43	8
kontempliatyvus/43	8
kuklus/82	8
lojalus/43	8
lygus/82	8
lūžus/43	8
mašinalus/43	8
narsus/43	8
neadaptyvus/43	8
neaiškus/82	8
neapdairus/43	8
neatsargus/43	8
nebeekstremalus/245	8
nebemobilus/245	8
nebeprabangus/245	8
nebesvarbus/43	8
nebrandus/43	8
nebylus/82	8
neekvivalentus/43	8
nefiktyvus/43	8
negausus/43	8
neišdidus/43	8
neiškilus/43	8
nejautrus/43	8
nekvapus/43	8
nelydus/43	8
nemalonus/82	8
nematerialus/43	8
nenormatyvus/43	8
nenuožulnus/43	8
nepasiturintis/246	8
nepaslankus/43	8
nepatiklus/43	8
nepavydus/43	8
neproduktyvus/43	8
neramus/82	8
nereaktyvus/43	8
nerespektabilus/245	8
nesavarankus/43	8
nesklandus/43	8
nestaigus/43	8
nestropus/43	8
nesvaigus/43	8
netolydus/43	8
neužmaršus/43	8
nevalgus/43	8
nevešlus/43	8
nevisažinantis/246	8
neįžūlus/43	8
nežiaurus/43	8
nežvarbus/43	8
nuolankus/43	8
nuostabus/82	8
nuošalus/82	8
optimalus/43	8
opus/43	8
panašus/82	8
pasiturintis/246	8
patogus/82	8
patrauklus/82	8
pavaldus/82	8
personalus/43	8
platus/82	8
prakaulus/43	8
prakilnus/43	8
privatus/82	8
produktyvus/43	8
radikalus/43	8
radioaktyvus/43	8
ramus/82	8
recesyvus/43	8
ryškus/82	8
saldus/82	8
sekantis/246	8
sekuliarus/43	8
skaudus/82	8
skilus/43	8
slidus/43	8
smulkus/82	8
specialus/82	8
stiprus/82	8
sunkus/82	8
svarbus/82	8
talpus/43	8
tamprus/43	8
taurus/43	8
teisus/82	8
tylus/82	8
užgaidus/43	8
valkšnus/43	8
veiksnus/43	8
veikus/43	8
visagalintis/246	8
visažinantis/246	8
įvairus/82	8
šoklus/43	8
švelnus/82	8
ūmus/43	8
žiaurus/82	8
žvilgus/43	8
žvitrus/43	8
